District of Columbia statutes.
2-1396

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-111, § 7, 53 DCR 2532
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7074, 55 DCR 7598
Elections, initiative and referendum, see § 1-1101.16.
Government pay equity and training, “equitable job-evaluation technique” and “protected classes” defined, see § 32-601.
Health care benefits expansion, limitations of law, see § 32-710.
Health occupations, advanced registered nurses, collaboration with licensed health care providers, see § 3-1206.03.
Health occupations, revocation, suspension, or denial of license, civil penalties, see § 3-1205.14.
Licensure, non-health related occupations, revocation, suspension, or denial of license, civil penalties, see § 47-2853.17.
Motor vehicles, no-fault insurance, cancellation, prohibited discrimination, see § 31-2409.
Real estate broker, salespersons, and property managers; licensure, prohibited acts, see § 47-2853.197.
Administration, merit system, attorneys employed by District, residency requirement, see § 1-608.59.
Administration, merit system, career service, career service positions, hiring preference for residents, see § 1-608.01.
Administration, merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.
Administration, merit system, educational service, hiring preference for residents, see § 1-608.01a.
Administration, merit system, employment in or appointment to excepted service, residency requirement, see § 1-609.06.
Cable operator, employment discrimination prohibited, see § 34-1262.01.